apertium-frp.frp.metadix
<pardef n="/avêr__vbhaver">
  <e>       <p><l>avêr</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èyent</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>avu</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>avus</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>avua</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>avues</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>âs</l>        <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avens</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avons</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éd</l>        <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éde</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avéd</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avéde</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ont</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>avê</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avô</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avên</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avês</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avêt</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avans</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avâd</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avant</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviê</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviên</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviês</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviêt</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avians</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="corpus"><p><l>aviens</l><r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviâd</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviant</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="corpus"><p><l>aviont</l><r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avévo</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avéves</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avéve</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avévens</l>   <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avévâd</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avévont</l>   <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviévo</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviéves</l>   <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviéve</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviévens</l>  <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviévâd</l>   <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aviévont</l>  <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>aré</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arés</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arat</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arens</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aréd</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aront</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>arê</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arên</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arês</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arêt</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arans</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arians</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arâd</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ariâd</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arant</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ariant</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>èyo</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èyes</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èye</l>       <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èyens</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èyad</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>èyéd</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>èyont</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>usso</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usses</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usse</l>      <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussens</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussâd</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>usséd</l>     <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussont</l>    <r>avêr<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="avêr">            <i></i><par n="/avêr__vbhaver"/></e>
